Hawaii statutes.
§348-1 State vocational rehabilitation;
policy and scope. (a) Vocational rehabilitation services shall be
provided to handicapped individuals throughout the State in accordance with
this chapter and within the limits of available federal, state, and private
funds. The vocational rehabilitation plan, formulated in conformance with the
Federal Vocational Rehabilitation Act, as amended, and adopted pursuant to this
chapter, shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the State.

(b) The acceptance of federal funds,
donations, grants-in-aid, and outright grants, for use in carrying out the
purposes of this chapter, is authorized, provided restrictions imposed by the
donor are not inconsistent with this chapter. [L 1955, c 231, pt of §2; RL
1955, §42-30; HRS §348-1; am L 1969, c 53, §1; am L 1979, c 188, §1(1)]

Cross References

Administration of vocational rehabilitation, see §26-14.

Regulation of occupational therapy practice, see chapter
457G.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next